Mississippi, session 2026, HB4031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions to provide funding to Mississippi Valley State University for carrying out the purposes of the Student Success and Workforce Readiness Strategy, as described in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................... $ 2,500,000.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by Mississippi Valley State University for carrying out the purposes of the Student Success and Workforce Readiness Strategy as follows: (a)  Modernizing its technology structure to strengthen student performance, increase retention and graduation rates, expand digital recruitment, and enhance workforce and career readiness and outcomes  $ 728,000.00 (b)  Investing in key personnel positions that directly support retention, academic progress, and career readiness............... ................................................. $ 1,772,000.00 TOTAL............................................ $ 2,500,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.